Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.260

State of emergency—Prosecution of persons sixteen years or over as adults.

After the proclamation of a state of emergency as provided in RCW 43.06.010 any person sixteen years of age or over who violates any provision of RCW 43.06.010, and 43.06.200 through 43.06.270 shall be prosecuted as an adult.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 186 s 7.]